Virginia statutes. Title 50. Partnerships.
Article 9.1. Registered Limited Liability Partnerships.
§ 50-73.137:2.
Known claims against dissolved registered limited liability partnership.

A partnership that is dissolved pursuant to §

50-73.117

that is a registered limited liability partnership at the time of its dissolution may dispose of the known claims against it by following the procedure described in this section.

The dissolved registered limited liability partnership shall deliver to each of its known claimants written notice of the dissolution at any time after its effective date. The written notice shall:

Provide a reasonable description of the claim that the claimant may be entitled to assert;

State whether the claim is admitted, or not admitted, and if admitted (i) the amount that is admitted, which may be as of a given date, and (ii) any interest obligation if fixed by an instrument of indebtedness;

Provide a mailing address where a claim may be sent;

State a deadline, which may not be fewer than 120 days from the effective date of the written notice, by which confirmation of the claim shall be delivered to the dissolved registered limited liability partnership; and

State that, except to the extent that any claim is admitted, the claim will be barred if written confirmation of the claim is not delivered by the deadline.

A claim against the dissolved registered limited liability partnership is barred to the extent that it is not admitted:

If the dissolved registered limited liability partnership delivered written notice to the claimant in accordance with subsection B of this section and the claimant does not deliver written confirmation of the claim to the dissolved registered limited liability partnership by the deadline; or

If the dissolved registered limited liability partnership delivered written notice to the claimant that its claim is not admitted, in whole or in part, and the claimant does not commence a proceeding to enforce the claim within 90 days from the delivery of written confirmation of the claim to the dissolved registered limited liability partnership.

For purposes of this section, “claim” does not include (i) a contingent liability or a claim based on an event occurring after the effective date of dissolution or (ii) a liability or claim the ultimate maturity of which is more than 60 days after the delivery of written notice to the claimant pursuant to subsection B of this section.

If a liability exists but the full extent of any damages is or may not be ascertainable, and a proceeding to enforce the claim is commenced pursuant to subdivision C 2 of this section, the claimant may amend the pleadings after filing to include any damages that occurred or are alleged to have occurred after filing, and the court having jurisdiction of such claim may continue such proceeding during its pendency if it appears that further damages are or still may be occurring.

History.

2004, c. 601.

§ 50-73.137:3.
Other claims against dissolved registered limited liability partnership.

A dissolved partnership that is a registered limited liability partnership at the time of its dissolution may also publish notice of its dissolution and request that persons with claims against the dissolved partnership present them in accordance with the notice.

The notice shall:

Be published one time in a newspaper of general circulation in the city or county where the dissolved partnership’s principal office, or, if none in the Commonwealth, its registered office, is or was last located;

Describe the information that must be included in a claim and provide a mailing address where the claim may be sent; and

State that a claim against the dissolved partnership will be barred unless a proceeding to enforce the claim is commenced prior to the earlier of the expiration of any applicable statute of limitations or three years after the date of publication of the notice.

If the dissolved partnership publishes a newspaper notice in accordance with subsection B, the claim of each of the following claimants is barred unless the claimant commences a proceeding to enforce the claim against the dissolved partnership prior to the earlier of the expiration of any applicable statute of limitations or three years after the publication date of the newspaper notice:

A claimant who was not given written notice under §

50-73.137:2

;

A claimant whose claim was timely sent to the dissolved partnership but not acted on; and

A claimant whose claim does not meet the definition of a claim in subsection D of §

50-73.137:2

.

A claim that is not barred by subsection C of §

50-73.137:2

or subsection C of §

50-73.137:3

may be enforced:

Against the dissolved partnership, to the extent of its undistributed assets; or

Except as provided in subsection D of §

50-73.137:4

, if the assets have been distributed in liquidation, against a partner of the dissolved partnership to the extent of the partner’s pro rata share of the claim or the partnership assets distributed to the partner in liquidation, whichever is less, but a partner’s total liability for all claims under this section may not exceed the total amount of assets distributed to the partner.

History.

2006, c. 912.

§ 50-73.137:4.
Court proceedings.

A dissolved limited liability partnership that has published a notice under §

50-73.137:3

may file an application with the circuit court of the city or county where the dissolved partnership’s principal office, or, if none in the Commonwealth, its registered office, is or was last located for a determination of the amount and form of security to be provided for payment of claims that are contingent or have not been made known to the dissolved partnership or that are based on an event occurring after the effective date of dissolution but that, based on the facts known to the dissolved partnership, are reasonably estimated to arise after the effective date of dissolution. Provision need not be made for any claim that is or is reasonably anticipated to be barred under subsection C of §

50-73.137:3

.

Within 10 days after the filing of the application, notice of the proceeding shall be given by the dissolved partnership to each claimant holding a contingent claim whose contingent claim is shown on the records of the dissolved partnership.

The court may appoint a guardian ad litem to represent all claimants whose identities are unknown in any proceeding brought under this section. The reasonable fees and expenses of such guardian, including all reasonable expert witness fees, shall be paid by the dissolved partnership.

Provision by the dissolved partnership for security in the amount and the form ordered by the court under subsection A shall satisfy the dissolved partnership’s obligations with respect to claims that do not meet the definition of a claim in subsection D of §

50-73.137:2

, and such claims may not be enforced against a partner who received assets in liquidation.

History.

2006, c. 912.

§ 50-73.138.
Registration of foreign registered limited liability partnerships.

Before transacting business in the Commonwealth, a foreign registered limited liability partnership shall register with the Commission. An applicant for registration as a foreign registered limited liability partnership shall file with the Commission a certificate of status from the filing office in the jurisdiction in which the foreign registered limited liability partnership is registered and a statement of registration as a foreign limited liability partnership setting forth the information described in subsection B.

A statement of registration as a foreign registered limited liability partnership shall set forth the following:

The name of the foreign registered limited liability partnership and, if the name of the foreign registered limited liability partnership does not comply with §

50-73.133

, a designated name for use in the Commonwealth that satisfies the requirements of §

50-73.133

;

The name of the state or other jurisdiction under whose law it is formed and registered as a limited liability partnership, and if the registered limited liability partnership was previously authorized or registered to transact business in the Commonwealth as a foreign corporation, limited liability company, business trust, limited partnership, or registered limited liability partnership, with respect to every such prior authorization or registration, (i) the name of the entity; (ii) the entity type; (iii) the state or other jurisdiction of incorporation, organization or formation; and (iv) the entity identification number issued to it by the Commission;

If the partnership is of record with the Commission, the identification number issued by the Commission to the partnership;

The address, including the street and number, if any, of its principal office;

The post office address, including the street and number, if any, of its initial registered office, which in the case of a foreign limited partnership registered pursuant to Chapter 2.1 (§

50-73.1

et seq.) of this title shall be identical to the foreign limited partnership’s registered office address on record with the Commission;

The name of the city or county in which the registered office is located;

The name of its initial registered agent at that office, which in the case of a foreign limited partnership registered pursuant to Chapter 2.1 (§

50-73.1

et seq.) of this title shall be identical to the foreign limited partnership’s registered agent on record with the Commission, and that the agent is either (i) an individual who is a resident of Virginia and is either a general partner of the registered limited liability partnership, an officer or director of a corporate general partner of the registered limited liability partnership, a general partner of a general partner of the registered limited liability partnership, a member or manager of a limited liability company that is a general partner of the registered limited liability partnership, a trustee of a trust that is a general partner of the registered limited liability partnership, or a member of the Virginia State Bar or (ii) a domestic or foreign stock or nonstock corporation, limited liability company, or registered limited liability partnership authorized to transact business in the Commonwealth; and

That the partnership thereby applies for status as a foreign registered limited liability partnership.

The Commission shall register as a foreign registered limited liability partnership any partnership that submits a completed statement of registration with the required fee.

The registration of a foreign registered limited liability partnership shall continue until its registration is canceled pursuant to subsection C of §

50-73.134

, subsection F of §

50-73.135

, §

50-73.137:1

, or

50-73.139

.

History.

1996, c. 292; 2002, c. 441; 2003, c. 378; 2004, c. 274; 2009, c. 716.

Cross references.

As to merger of foreign corporation, see §

13.1-766.1

.

As to articles of merger under the Virginia Limited Liability Company Act, see §

13.1-1072

.

The 2002 amendments.

The 2002 amendment c. 441 substituted “subsection C” for “subsection D” in subdivision D 1.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 378, in subdivision B 1, substituted “the name of the foreign registered limited liability partnership does not comply with §

50-73.133

, a designated name for use in this Commonwealth that satisfies the requirements of §

50-73.133

” for “the name under which it proposes to transact business in this Commonwealth. The name under which a foreign registered limited liability partnership proposes to transact business in this Commonwealth shall comply with § 50-73.133”; added present subdivision B 3; redesignated former subdivision B 3 as present subdivision B 4, and
in subdivision B 4, inserted “including the street and number, if any”; deleted former subdivision B 4, which read: “The address of a registered office and the name and address of a registered agent for service of process in this Commonwealth required to be maintained in accordance with §

50-73.135

; and”; added subdivisions B 5 through B 7; redesignated former subdivision B 5 as present subdivision B 8; in subdivision D 1, deleted “statement” following “registration”; inserted “or” at the end of subdivision D 2; and added subdivision D 3.

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 274 rewrote subdivision B 2, which formerly read: “The jurisdiction in which it is registered as a limited liability partnership and the laws of which govern the agreement pursuant to which it was formed”; and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendment by c. 716 rewrote subsection D.

§ 50-73.139.
Withdrawal of a foreign registered limited liability partnership.

A foreign registered limited liability partnership authorized to transact business in this Commonwealth may withdraw from this Commonwealth by filing with the Commission a statement of cancellation of registration as a foreign registered limited liability partnership that shall set forth:

The name of the foreign registered limited liability partnership and the state or other jurisdiction under whose jurisdiction it was registered as a limited liability partnership and the laws of which govern the agreement pursuant to which it was formed;

That the foreign registered limited liability partnership is not transacting business in this Commonwealth and that it surrenders its registration to transact business in this Commonwealth;

That the foreign registered limited liability partnership revokes the authority of its registered agent in this Commonwealth to accept service of process and appoints the clerk of the Commission as its agent for service of process in any action, suit, or proceeding based upon any cause of action arising during the time the foreign registered limited liability partnership was authorized to transact business in this Commonwealth; and

A mailing address to which the clerk of the Commission may mail a copy of any process served on him under subdivision 3.

History.

1996, c. 292.

§ 50-73.140.
Effect of failure of foreign registered limited liability partnership to register.

The failure of a foreign registered limited liability partnership to file a statement of registration or to maintain that registration or to appoint and maintain a registered agent in this Commonwealth as required in §

50-73.135

shall not impair the validity of any contract or act of the foreign registered limited liability partnership and shall neither prevent the foreign registered limited liability partnership from defending any action or proceeding in any court of this Commonwealth nor affect the application of the laws of the jurisdiction governing the agreement under which it was formed as provided in subsection E of §

50-73.141

, but the foreign registered limited liability partnership may not maintain any action or proceeding in any court of this Commonwealth until it has filed an application for registration. A foreign registered limited liability partnership, by transacting business in this Commonwealth without registration, appoints the clerk of the Commission as its agent for service of process with respect to causes of action arising out of the transaction of business in this Commonwealth. Service on that foreign registered limited liability partnership shall be made on the clerk of the Commission in accordance with §

12.1-19.1

.

History.

1996, c. 292.

§ 50-73.141.
Applicability of chapter to foreign and interstate commerce.

A registered limited liability partnership may conduct its business, carry on its operations, and have and exercise the powers granted by this chapter in any state, territory, district, or possession of the United States or in any foreign country.

It is the policy of this Commonwealth that registered limited liability partnerships formed pursuant to agreements governed by the laws of this Commonwealth be recognized outside this Commonwealth and that the laws of this Commonwealth governing registered limited liability partnerships transacting business outside this Commonwealth be granted the protection of full faith and credit under the Constitution of the United States.

It is the policy of this Commonwealth that in the case of a registered limited liability partnership the relations among the partners and between the partners and the partnership, and the liability of partners for debts, obligations and liabilities chargeable to the partnership, shall be subject to and governed by the laws of this Commonwealth.

Subject to any statutes for the regulation and control of specific types of business, foreign registered limited liability partnerships may do business in this Commonwealth.

It is the policy of this Commonwealth that in the case of a foreign registered limited liability partnership (whether or not registered under §

50-73.140

) the relations among the partners and between the partners and the partnership, and the liability of partners for debts, obligations and liabilities chargeable to the partnership, shall be subject to and governed by the laws of the jurisdiction that govern the agreement under which it was formed.

History.

1996, c. 292.

§ 50-73.142.
Limited partnerships as registered limited liability partnerships.

A domestic limited partnership may become a registered limited liability limited partnership by complying with the applicable provisions of the Virginia Revised Uniform Limited Partnership Act.

History.

1996, c. 292.

§ 50-73.143.
Registration certificate required for registered limited liability partnership engaged in practice of law.

Before any registered limited liability partnership may engage in the practice of law in this Commonwealth, it shall first obtain and maintain a registration certificate required for that registered limited liability partnership by Chapter 39 (§

54.1-3900

et seq.) of Title 54.1.

History.

1996, c. 292.

Law Review.

For article reviewing changes in Virginia corporate and business law from June 2001 through May 2002, see 37 U. Rich. L. Rev. 1 (2002).